[Verse 1]
I adamantly attack the alphabet
With an anecdotal algorithm made of Adamantium
I'm like an Adderrall addicted anaconda or an alcoholic
Or an asshole, like A-Rod, no anabolics
But I, brutally and beautifully butcher the banging beat
Brushin' bubbly allover your booby and booty beef
Cause I'm a carpenter, I come carvin' your carcass
Leaving all these carp fish crushed on the carpet
Crumble chron' in Colorado with my Cal cronies
I'm Crammin' it full of condiments like it's a Calzone delicious!
I didn't drive and drink
Whether diamonds or dimes man I'm diving deep like an
Electric eel, I'm elegantly eloquent and every cent I've ever earned
Just entered me in the election
I got eleven brains like an enormously educated Einstein with Elephantitis
Of the erection
A freak! I'm fighting with a flatfooted felon
Five falcons just flew to a fountain, and fell in
Googling, googly-eyed girls to get inside
Golly gee from GlasGow to Guatemela's gentrified
A hippopotamus is high on heroin he heckles me
And hires Haitian Hank to hand his ho a hysterectomy
In hateful hieroglyph I hurl-out hyperbolic hubris
And hang with Hipster Helen that's the hooker with huge hips
I'm ill. I'm Icarus. I ignite idiots in idioms and issues
Jumpy jargon I joust like Jacare jivin Japanese Judo and Jiujitsu
Killin' em like a kid.. got a Kilogram of Ketamine for Kwanza
Knit a Kimono made of Komodo Dragon skin
I'm rich like a Klingon that be kicking it at the Kremlin
But I'm kicking through your door, call me Kramer Kardashian
Lethal, Literally litter a little limerick
That be littler than a Leprechaun
A menace that'll manifest the melancholy mayhem
Makin a metamorphosis until I'm mechanized like Megatron
Nick Nolte: a nerdy native of Nebraska
Needs a neon ninja and a nectarine from NASA
Ominously, I mean it's obvious you see a:
Orthodontist oozing out oodles of onomatopoeia
Oswalt: Patton
Pickin a pocket pluckin a patent
I pickle purple poop in Patron for pure passion
I got a question, I gotta quiz ya'
Lets step on the gas and go quicker
Really getting ready for the revolution
Reeled a rotten rhythm ring around a Russia Ronda Rousey resort
Serve a simple sentiment a simile that's smokin
Like a sheet of Sudafed i'm swiftly swimming like a seahorse
Titties on Atilla Tell a teller that'll toe tag
Terminator gun inside a turtle tattered tote bag
Thugs are un-american unattractive  and unwanted as an ugly pair of ugg's
Vivid and vivaciously venomous
With the wicked wombats only walking where women is
Gettin xenophobic at the Xanadu
XoXo
Yippy-ki-yay,!
Yours' Truly
Mac
YES YO!!!

Oh shit, I forgot Z
ZebraHappy Birthday Duriel!
From me and Lauren!
My name is Mac Lethal
But I'm gonna spit some
Paler and faster fucking lyrics
Oh hi!
My name's Mac Ecstasy, cocaine and crack
None of that I just smoke green
While Chinese people eat your cat
Roll by on a low-ride Huffy Simpsons on and my
Beer is Duff see
Cuff rolled up to my ass Cash out the ass cuz
I wrote a couple raps for Puffy
Gotta be the one to bite the bullet I'm a sinner
But I bet I could have been a better man
I wanna be Zen but I go sipping on some medicine
Instead of meditating see I get it while I can
I don’t wanna wind up in the gutter with a bottle of malt liquor
Bitter cuz I never got A call, but who the fuck drinks malt liquor anymore?
Gimme vodka now and start sucking on my balls!
Motherfuckers wanna have another personal epiphany
I’m coming with a symphony eliminating everybody/anybody
Roll up like a cannibal and bite em like a peanut butter
Apple in a minute I’mma nibble on a pentagram and
Every single bitter lamb ss getting so offended
I don’t give a damn if anything a mental plan
Is coming as a visually integrated entity and
Everybody’s gonna get the guillotine
I’m getting cinematic in a matter of a minute
Every milligram is devilish the Vatican will kill it DEAD
Gonna kill it til it’s dead
I’mma try to get em in the head. corn-fed
Midwestern whore bred
She looks so thick and juicy give it to me in the booty shorts then You gotta get up in the morn and GET OUT!
(BIG ASS BREATH)
Never been a counterfeit of nothing I am just an elevated
Entity I’m coming and giving it back and then pumping
Dump on every instrument with increments of syllables
And sentiments I lunge I’m livid again I’m sticking it in
Their muffins make a couple million I’m hoping to I’m going to
So gimme another reason I should sit around an not experience
Benefits of getting down when all the drivel that they’re spitting
Is so hideous Godzilla fear the viciousness![Verse 1]
This is just advice, listen if you will
Every single day you're liquor sipping when you chill
Livin' with your parents, never chip in for the bills
You need to scrub the dirty dishes in their kitchen off for real
This is just your life, listen if you want
Don't just spend your whole day on the sofa hittin' blunts
You are in the back of the line right now
You gotta progress, you gotta move, you gotta work, so we can get you to the front
Put the nuggets down, put some veggies on your plate
Exercise a bit, feel incredible and great
You're addicted to your iPhone, saying that you're lonely
Use to speak English, now the language is Emoji
Be on time to work, don't upset your boss
Every single day you gotta brush your teeth and floss
If you can get eight hours of sleep at night
Or mentally you'll be lost
Consume a lot of food and water before you go drink
Lots of alcohol or you'll be puking in the sink
Break-ups really freaking hurt let me mention
Before you fall in love, know the persons intentions
Listen to this twice, this is just your life
Even if you're not religious live it like you're Christ
Gotta just accept that there will be days where you wake up feeling crappy
It don't matter make it your mission to be nice

[Mac Lethal starts speaking]
Look kids, I know that adulthood is a little scary
But trust me, follow these words and you'll be just fine
Also, drink coffee
Lets speed it up

[Verse 2]
Pay your freaking taxes every single year in April
Buy a little bit of property and build yourself a home, man
You should probably start a company cuz paying off those student loans is difficult
But either way do something with your life
Don't spend every paycheck that you make on Micheal Kors and pairs of Jordans
Invest your money, save it for retirement
And wait until you're 30 to get married and before you go have children
You should travel with your husband or your wife
If you have a conversation look the person in the eye
And if you shake their hand then you should do it with a firm grip
Don't make fun of people cuz a lot of them are going through
Depression, pain and sorrow they're not telling you about
Be an individual with principal and character and try to treat the people
That surround you with respect
You gotta try to lose your ego if you wanna gain momentum
Now go out and show the whole entire World what you're about[Verse]
I'm coming down the chimney like I'm Santa with an AK47
If you're naughty then I'm taking all your presents
It's December the 25th and if you're building in the way you should
I'm giving a couple gifts to all the children in your neighborhood
Unless you know somebody that's a rotten fucker
Then you better just believe that I'ma show at Christmas Eve
And then I'm gonna give their mom a muffler
As a stocking stuffer
Damn it, kid, I'm standing with an AK47 in the middle of the city
Where the criminals are gritty and they're tough!
Gotta entreprise a little bit and own a company
Cuz slaving for the man and making pennies ain't enough
It's Christmas but fuck your wish list cuz you're already gifted!
So give yourself independence and start your own business!
Gotta hustle with a vengeance here is some motivation
You may need and it's too damn true
Lil Wayne is only 5'5 mothafucka
If he can be successful then you can too!
You know I'm high up on the trees like an angel
I be rippin' to the rhythm of the sleigh bells
I don't care about a person saying they're a Rap God
Cuz when you're underground you gotta face hell
Just what I enjoy little drummer boy
Barum ba bum bum man, it is such a joy
When I'm going dumb da dumb I shoot a missile and destroy
Finding the work and finding a purpose like a kid that's unemployed
I'm drunk Santa Clause I just drank a fifth
Getting crazier than Jaden Smith
So you can tell The Grinch I put some mistletoe above my ass
And now he knows where to place his lips
Check it out, I'm vaping marijuana cuz it centers me
Is giving me the energy to rip the beat up vividly
And even when I'm 63 and when the air is so polluted
That it makes you sick to breathe I'll prolly be a sick MC
The sickest in the history of anything I went to war with 50 kings
And ate the planet Saturn in a single bite and sniffed the rings
You gotta take some shrooms and try to smoke dimethyltryptamine
To see a vision this incredible the devil in your dreams
I'm bigger than the universe, I'm infinite like human thirst
For water and like water from the glaciers I consume the Earth
They call me Lethal Clause and I'm the fastest in the world
I got your grandpa some golf clubs, your grandma some pearls
Baby now you know I got the rhymin' stamina
Kill you while you shittin' like you Tywin Lannister
I don't wanne have to go and damage your entire face
Peace I'm out back up the fire place!The following is an exclusive excerpt from the third chapter of my new book Texts from Bennett (a novel). The book will be released on September 3rd by Simon & Schuster, and will be available wherever books are sold. Copyright © 2013 by David Sheldon.

Who’s the greatest basketball player of all time?

Who’s the most ferocious boxer of all time?

Think of a number between one and ten. Got it? Good

Michael Jordan, Mike Tyson, and the number seven are all prime examples of a single entity being such a powerful, behemoth force in their respective industries that they erase whoever came before them from memory and are used as a constant measuring tool to compare and contrast whoever comes after them

Now. Think of a few famous rappers. Got ’em? Who’d you come up with? 50 Cent? Jay-Z? Kanye West? 2Pac? Biggie? LL Cool J? Lil Wayne?

Good job. But what about white rappers? How many can you name? And no, Vanilla Ice doesn’t count. He was a major record label experiment gone awry. I mean famous, certifiably talented, white rappers. Who’d you conjure up? Got him?

Eminem

Eminem is an undeniable talent. He deserves every dollar and fan he has accrued over the last decade. However, the motherfucker kinda sorta casted a titanic eclipse over the hip-hop genre and type-casted every other melanin-deficient rapper as nothing more than an Eminem wannabe

Well, at least on a mainstream level

If I were to tell you that there are several hardworking, but not super famous, white rappers who began their careers before Eminem even existed in the public eye, and who currently make a decent-to-great living off modern rap music, would you believe me? And I don’t mean white poseurs, drinking Moscato, throwing wads of cash around in their videos, acting like “stereotypical black rappers.” I mean rappers who rap about day-to-day things people of all races go through. Authentic rappers, with skills and rhythm and a voice worth listening to. I’m one of those rappers

I’ve gone by Mac my entire life, but my legal name is David McCleary Sheldon. I’m a thirtywhatever, full-blooded American male with grandparents from Kilkenny and Cork. I inherited the classic Irish temper; a pasty, outer layer of skin; and ginger facial hair that blends with the chalky black hair my Black Irish relatives always had

A NOTE ON THOSE BLUE-EYED, DRACULA-LOOKIN’ MOTHERFUCKERS:
As I’ve explained to Bennett on at least ten different occasions, “Black Irish” is a term used to describe descendants of immigrants from the prehistoric Iberia and Basque regions who hybridized with Irish natives in 7000 BC. It’s not referring to African American people with Irish names, e.g., my sixth-grade teacher Mrs. McCormick, and Eddie Murphy.

I was born in Kansas City, Missouri, during the Leo moon to Warren and Ruth Sheldon. My dad is a hardworking, blue-collar Ohio boy who has a problem being nice to waitresses and terrible road rage. My mom was an artsy, thoughtful, Saint Louis belle, who was always very nice to waitresses and drove too slow. My parents divorced when I was five years old, so I never really saw them married, but they lived only a few blocks away from each other, so I had a solid relationship with both of them while growing up. My mom died in 2004, but I still have my dad; my two sisters, Rose and Evelyn; and their great husbands, Greg and Henry

I’ve loved Brazilian jujitsu, movies, and rap music for my entire life. I spent a majority of my formative years having vivid daydreams, staring into the distance, thinking about girls, and being completely disconnected from what was going on in the classroom. I was a space cadet, fully apathetic to the idea of success or work. School was so boring. I just wanted to sleep

What might surprise people: my Kansas City high school was a third Caucasian, a third Latino, and a third African American. There were also a few Asian and Indian kids, a band of Russians, and one Lakota kid, who came to school on hallucinogenic mushrooms at least twice a week and whose legal name was Adam Little Elk Running Over the Enemy. (What up, Adam? Call me when you see this!) There were a lot of drugs, fights, and troubled kids at my school. There was also a nursery for the girls who had babies

I wasn’t necessarily a bad kid, especially compared to some. But I did have disciplinary issues. I skipped school a lot, got caught smoking pot in the parking lot a few times, and even got busted for having vodka mixed into a plastic bottle of Tropicana orange juice. I just wasn’t stimulated by the stuff my teachers were teaching

I tried to get my parents to let me attend an art school of some sort, where I could develop right-brain abilities like sketching, oil painting, and creative writing -— but they declined. They didn’t have the money to send me somewhere like that. So, instead, I just sat in decay, year after year, letting public schoolteachers cover my third eye with black spray paint

One random, agonizingly boring day during sophomore year, having slept through my morning classes, I was quite refreshed after lunch and was sitting in study hall with nothing to do. Not unusual. That day, though, I borrowed a piece of paper from Letasha Tilman and wrote MC Reptile at the top of it (my first rapper alias)

I still remember the verse by heart:

My name is MC Reptile
I weave words together like textiles
I grab the microphone and smack the sheriff off his saddle
I battle like a rattlesnake and make you all skidaddle
Rappers fuck with me they get beaten like eggs
You try to kick rhymes and I’m eatin’ your legs
I stay so fresh, cook rappers like gizzards
Bitch I’m the wizard, the Reptile lizard

It may not look like much, but the mere act of writing those eight lines permanently seared the cobwebs from my imagination and inspired me to never sleep during class again. Instead, I began nurturing my passion for rapping

I’d heard the cliché: “You must spend ten thousand hours intensely practicing something to master it.” So for the next six years, I did just that. I filled countless notebooks with rap lyrics, constantly challenging myself to parent my own, unique writing style. I read dictionaries and thesauri to expand my vocabulary, memorizing all sorts of exotic words and their definitions

Borborygmus: the rumbling sound of gas passing through the intestine
Fuscoferuginous: having a dark, rusty color
Quomodocunquize: to make money by any means possible

I read every book I could find by William S. Burroughs, Jack Kerouac, Vladimir Nabokov, Ernest Hemingway, Mikhail Bulgakov, Kurt Vonnegut, and Cormac McCarthy to try and learn how to write with deliberate fluidity. I devoured every rap album I could find, picking apart each rapper’s deficiencies, adopting my interpretation of their strengths. I would freestyle rap for hours in my bedroom into a handheld tape recorder, while doing jumping jacks and push-ups. This helped me simultaneously improvise new rap ideas and develop lung power, projection, verbal articulation, enunciation, and breath control

I was methodical. I drilled constantly, pushing myself to improve. I never set out to be famous, or even make a living off music. I just wanted to impress kids in the high school cafeteria with my freestyle raps, while I made fun of Margot Glasscock’s last name, or rapped about sleeping with Miss Steele, the school’s foxy, thirty-two-year-old algebra teacher

After honing my rapping skills, I set up a makeshift studio in my mom’s basement and recorded my first album, Mixed Drinks. The writing was funny, weird, and quirky. I made songs about not being able to find my car keys, and getting broken up with by a girl I didn’t like in the first place but wanting to win her back just to have bragging rights on who broke up with whom. While it was lo-fi and sounded like crap, the people I passed it out to seemed to enjoy it for what it was. So I dropped out of high school and decided to pursue being a rapper full-time. Backup plans are for pussies

Touring seemed like the best way to expand my career, so I spent years networking with other independent artists, driving ten to fifteen hours every day, just to play free shows for crowds of fewer than fifty people. I passed out free tapes (and eventually CDs) that I assembled myself at Kinko’s and slept on the beer-stained apartment floors of random weirdos my crew and I would meet at shows, to avoid paying for a hotel room. I could fill an entire book with tour stories from my early years, most of them unfortunate

Touring and building a fan base from scratch is immensely hard, and most people don’t even achieve moderate success doing it. Most people quit the first time they fall flat on their face. Believe me, you have to be partially nuts to endure the things that traveling, working entertainers endure

Only 1 percent become megastars. The other 99 percent of us are on a daily grind, dreaming we can one day pay off our bills from music

Luckily, my dreams started to come true. After giving a passionate decade of my life to being a rapper, I started to turn a profit. My tiny, scattered, local following had enveloped into a dedicated worldwide fan base. I could play just about any part of the world, and pull at least one hundred people -- one thousand in some places

I sold t-shirts, CDs, trucker hats, sweatshirts, dog bowls, backpacks, fanny packs, socks, girl panties, pint glasses, shot glasses, et cetera -- all with my logo printed on them. I was a working, self-funded, independent rap artist, selling out shows, paying the bills, and living a dream that is oft never achieved by a majority of musicians, let alone rappers

For once in my life, music was no longer a struggle. It was a highly lucrative roller-coaster ride that afforded me the ability to travel anywhere and purchase anything I wanted, which was new to me, and slightly unsettling. I knew there was no way this could last forever, so I decided to invest my money wisely while my chips were up. I found an amazing, albeit slightly gaudy, house in the Brookside area of Kansas City, Missouri, put down a giant down payment (since touring tends to lead to bad credit), and moved in

I had my own home (I bought a house!), and it felt great

Me: Hey fucker, guess who?

Bennett: ?

Me: Guess who this is, you little dicked twerp

Bennett: ho i told u to stop texten me my girl gonna c dat shit

Bennett: bcide u wuz luven my big dicc in da parkin lot da otha nite lol slut

Me: Lol, you think this is a girl

Bennett: dis is ashly duh

Bennett: look.. u ever seen a tigger or a lion git married?

Bennett: u ever seen a eagel wit a diamend ring on it”s finger?

Bennett: no u haven't dats bcuz men R not saposed 2 be wit 1 women. men R wild animels......i fucc alot of hoez cuz men r saposed 2 spred there seed da bibel says we gatta evolve and fucc

Me: This isn’t a girl!!!!

Bennett: wat

Bennett: now u gunna try 2 say u were a guy da hole time?bitch i seen ur vaginna u a girl or u got a realy gud sex change

Me: LOL, STOP. This isn’t fucking Ashley. Who’s Ashley?

Bennett: quit playn on my phone bitch who dis !!!

Me: It’s Mac

Me: Helllooooo???

Bennett: mac my cuz??..

Me: Yes sir

Bennett: o shit lolz

Bennett: wud up G

Me: Care to explain what’s happening with your mom losing her house?

Bennett: man.. it sux

Bennett: basicly da punk ass govermant niggas is kiccin us out da crib Cuz day so broke dat even my mom bustid ass house is wort takin

Me: Is she not doing well? Why can’t she pay the bills?

Bennett: nigga my mom on Oxycotton 247365 times a day

Me: Do you mean 24/7/365?

Bennett: ya but im gittin sum pussy right now so i ain't have time to type dat side ways / thing

Me: Liar. You said “times a day” which negates a / even working. Bennett: look pussy u alweys talk shit to me when we txt.. u probaly jellice from all da COCC i sell and da $$$ i get

Me: You make money selling cock?

Bennett: na COCC... fuccin.. cocainn

NOTE FOR THOSE LOOKING TO LEARN HOW TO SPEAK FLUENT CRIP:
Members of the Crips do not ever put the letters C and K next to each other and just use two C’s instead. CK stands for Crip Killer, so this is a very serious typographical issue

Me: I’m fucking with you. WHY is your mom on OxyContin?

Bennett: cuz she also sleep all day an stop payen da bills..

Me: Her back is fucked up still, right? But OxyContin? Does she need OxyContin?

Bennett: ya she in pain alot. butt cmon playa n e 1 who take oxycotton does it for fun not bcuz they need it..nigga u ever try dat shit?it make u feel like ur 2pac in dat hot tub holden stax of cash pouren chammpane on a striperz head

Me: I see. Uh. Also, who’s Tim?

Bennett: dats my mom BF

Me: Yeah? You live with him, yeah? Why can’t he help with the bills?

Bennett: he wierd. he duz acid and smoke hella weed wit me but he a bum ass nigga 2.haha. he broke as fuk

Bennett: butt he smart like U doe.....

Bennett: he read sum wild ass books like U. sum crazy shit wit Da Illuminadi. he a wild ass nigga

Bennett: he show me a video on UTube of 911 an how da govermant planted dinamite in da billdings and blew dem up

Me: Do you believe that stuff, Bennett?

Bennett: hell yea who doeznt.?da white house has a grave unda it wit gosts and shit

Bennett: i dont beleive anything on Da news

Me: Right on, buddy. I’m going to call your mom. What’s her number?

Bennett: K hang on

Bennett: 913-648-****

Now that I knew more of the scoop, I called Aunt Lillian and extended an invitation for them all to come stay with me for a few weeks. She was so intoxicated on painkillers that I couldn’t understand a word she said, other than, “Thank you so much!”

This was spur of the moment, but I knew it was the right thing to do. Family is family. You’re supposed to help family. Right? And all I wanted to do right then was help my aunt. Especially after hearing the pain and confusion in her voice over the phone

Especially after what she did for me in 2002.

Continues...Go Royals. Rest in peace BB King. KC Kings

[Mac Lethal]

Check it out now
Here I come with the hype flow
Hear the drums and I might go
Bang!
I accelerate in centerfield when
I be running for the pop-up fly
You're thinking I'm like Lo Cain
Here's a preview
My name is Mr. Mac Maniac Lethal
I'm like Dyson when I'm dicin'
Or Walter White with a ciggy full of Ricin
That's what speed do
I'm gonna hit them with the EQ
I'm Mike Moustakas playing third base in my light blue dockers
Hitting to your opposite side so many times
They gotta find two doctors
Field of dreams, and I'm a white dude: Costner
This is Kansas City how we do it how we live it
Gonna rock it gonna battle gonna give it
Every single ounce of energy we got
We getting crazy getting loud
They're making Jordan's
But they gotta make some light blue Hosmers
We lead the pack, man in May weather
A way better fight than Pac-Man and Mayweather
We probably gonna bite them out of anger
We don't really care about Detroit, man
Tigers are endangered
Gordo got the platinum glove
Jump so high he could catch a dove
It's an act of love
Ryan and Hudler's back
You can't sneak a piece of cheese by a hungry rat
Morales up to bat the ball left the park
Hererra, Davis, Holland killing it no question mark
Gonna throw up an extra heart
Like I'm Alcides Escobar playing extra hard
Look, I don't smile when I pitch
I make the Yordano Ventura face
But you got them Kylie Jenner lips

Paulo triple-o he's making music with the bat
Like it's Apollo's piccolo
I hope you're following the flow
Cuz now we're winners
So I'll soak you like I'm Salvy with the gatorade
They think that' I'm a joker
But I'm actually the ace of spades
I'm picking up the bat and hitting homers out the stadium
The ball is flying by your head so fast it make your neck twist
Omar Infante and Alex Rios
And my main man Morales A.K.A. Cubano Breakfast
My head isn't bolted
I'm going lights out like I'm Edinson Volquez
In a Monarch's uniform
18th and Vine at the Negro League Museum
For Buck O'Neill we gotta rock hard and do it for him
Guthrie and Vargas are pitching the stones
Salvador Perez is sitting at home
And even though he's putting on perfume before he plays
It doesn't matter cuz we also got Christian Colon
610 - sports radio clicked in, gonna listen
To the drive and the country mart call in show
Man I'm tall with flows
Chris Young, boy 6'10
Say Denny Matthews never gives me bad news
Never thought a team could ever make the city that blue
With the best bullpen how can they survive?
We'll be champs until 2085 we live[Verse 1: Mac Lethal]
For every hole I've punched in the wall
Every piece of paper crumbled as we've suffer in the bloodiest fall
For every pulsating ego blistered into moon ripe nosebleeds
I nurse these festering wounds and drop no rose seeds
But grow an orchid garden
Now the pains on your portrait hardens with a face that resorts to jargon
Scribbled like a suicide note
Like I'll stop
I show the beauty by a profile shot
Freeze, don't fret for the truth
Cause I'll pray till I heard footsteps on the roof
I swear to god I don't believe in angels
Ask me, atheist, Ashley
Where's the wings in this relationship?
Passions has passed me, cast another spell
Mortified, melancholy, Madness to Michelle
Suicide Sarah, alliterate your fate, worship the absence and demonstrate my faith
(Glance in the mirror on my bathroom door
I saw her dance in rain in the summer downpour)
I saw her dance till the rain put the fire out
Burned at the stake, Joan of Arc, little anxious saint
I illustrate the gates of hell into my notebook her flesh burns up in the furnace
Ashes to Ashley
Earth to something earnest
I slit my wrist in cursive with an ink pen
Write a revelation, burn a stack of bibles
Question my faith, get my churlish ass to smile
Find another subtle piece of confidence to muster
Her ministry echoes in this monolithic structure
Cremate the dying Christmas trees
The winter is full of bitter, ashy, black blizzards
So when the superstition delivered
And it came down the chimney, they found her in the fireplace with me
Ashes to Ashley

[Bridge]
The fire's only half dead, how many angels can you fit on a matchhead?
Count them
Try start a fire
Do it
Turn the volume down or write a song to her movement (x4)

[Verse 2: Sadistik]
We walked a broken path while the sun was bleak
And we were holding hands on these rusted swings
That I called "us" and my love would sink
Underseas that we would drown underneath
When you would swim deep to catch my lip's speech
To try to catch drifts to catch what it means
And you found what would grow between us
So I thought about you while I wrote The Phoenix
And now my spine shivers from the notes that you speak
Of perfect pitched melodies and emotions you seek
That I'm composing in dreams, so you can see that I love you
And I'll hold your broken dreams till I'm bleeding in puddles
She breaks bones, engraves poems in gravestones (Text!)
Paints quotes of pathos as pain grows (Next!)
Rain flows became hopes of rainbows (When!)
Angels with halos and saints spoke (Blessed!)
Death to this world now we've given enough
I wanna hide you from the company that misery loves
And so I draw blood with few strokes and our love it drew close
So you can draw attention with the pen that you hold
Reveal your energy; and we'll just get to keep
The radio-active I can feel your chemistry
When we gaze at sea waves and freebase off replays
That re-late to cliches to see fate will be grace
I find peace in our dance on ice sheets
To bathe your silhouette in the tears the skies weep
We'll burn bridges to find warmth from life's storms
And cross roads at the point where lives meet
I'll show you memories I hate to reveal
If you could feel what I say Then I could say what I feel
And I finally learned what it takes to confess
I'll take you to a place filled with grace and sunsets[Verse 1]
I adamantly attack the alphabet
With an anecdotal algorithm made of Adamantium
I'm like an Adderrall addicted anaconda or an alcoholic
Or an asshole, like A-Rod, no anabolics
But I, brutally and beautifully butcher the banging beat
Brushin' bubbly allover your booby and booty beef
Cause I'm a carpenter, I come carvin' your carcass
Leaving all these carp fish crushed on the carpet
Crumble chron' in Colorado with my Cal cronies
I'm Crammin' it full of condiments like it's a Calzone delicious!
I didn't drive and drink
Whether diamonds or dimes man I'm diving deep like an
Electric eel, I'm elegantly eloquent and every cent I've ever earned
Just entered me in the election
I got eleven brains like an enormously educated Einstein with Elephantitis
Of the erection
A freak! I'm fighting with a flatfooted felon
Five falcons just flew to a fountain, and fell in
Googling, googly-eyed girls to get inside
Golly gee from GlasGow to Guatemela's gentrified
A hippopotamus is high on heroin he heckles me
And hires Haitian Hank to hand his ho a hysterectomy
In hateful hieroglyph I hurl-out hyperbolic hubris
And hang with Hipster Helen that's the hooker with huge hips
I'm ill. I'm Icarus. I ignite idiots in idioms and issues
Jumpy jargon I joust like Jacare jivin Japanese Judo and Jiujitsu
Killin' em like a kid.. got a Kilogram of Ketamine for Kwanza
Knit a Kimono made of Komodo Dragon skin
I'm rich like a Klingon that be kicking it at the Kremlin
But I'm kicking through your door, call me Kramer Kardashian
Lethal, Literally litter a little limerick
That be littler than a Leprechaun
A menace that'll manifest the melancholy mayhem
Makin a metamorphosis until I'm mechanized like Megatron
Nick Nolte: a nerdy native of Nebraska
Needs a neon ninja and a nectarine from NASA
Ominously, I mean it's obvious you see a:
Orthodontist oozing out oodles of onomatopoeia
Oswalt: Patton
Pickin a pocket pluckin a patent
I pickle purple poop in Patron for pure passion
I got a question, I gotta quiz ya'
Lets step on the gas and go quicker
Really getting ready for the revolution
Reeled a rotten rhythm ring around a Russia Ronda Rousey resort
Serve a simple sentiment a simile that's smokin
Like a sheet of Sudafed i'm swiftly swimming like a seahorse
Titties on Atilla Tell a teller that'll toe tag
Terminator gun inside a turtle tattered tote bag
Thugs are un-american unattractive  and unwanted as an ugly pair of ugg's
Vivid and vivaciously venomous
With the wicked wombats only walking where women is
Gettin xenophobic at the Xanadu
XoXo
Yippy-ki-yay,!
Yours' Truly
Mac
YES YO!!!

Oh shit, I forgot Z
ZebraI just want to be able to fly!

Yo, why do I keep putting all this pressure on myself?
Looking in the mirror lecturing myself
As-if it's possible for me to ever be better than myself
It's like I'm measuring my health by fame and money
But even if I'm broke the day still looks the same and sunny

I'm shrouded by these black clouds
Screamin' as I'm jabbin' the wall
I got a crown of thorns up on my head
I'm grabbin' my balls
I tried to break the doors of heaven
But I fucked up and shot myself in the foot with an AK-47
Today I had to use my AK
I gotta say it was a bad day
I ain't fuckin' joking, shit is mad cray
The stupid radio has been playing stupider tunes
I wanna move to one of Jupiter's moons
And live forever

I'm starin' at the ceiling once again (once again)
Wondering if I'm just wasting time (wasting time)
I'm starin' at the ceiling once again (once again)
I made a blanket from this cape of mine - I'm sayin'

If you're lookin' for a super-hero baby
Well, motherfucker, that ain't me
I hate a lot of situations, wanna live in isolation
Make this world something that I can't see

I remember turning 30
I realized I gotta be stern and sturdy
It's real life, I gotta try to and earn and hurry
Gotta get concerned, man, I gotta get up early every day
Gotta work 10:30, just to hunt the worm and birdy

And get a permed and purty girly from Kansas City, Missouri
That grew up on cans of tuna, and cans of shittier curry
I'm an artist
I'm a poet
My stanza's pretty and blurry
I'm rich, that's just something these dancers titties assure me, but
How can I enjoy a dancer with rump?
My ex-girl just told me that she found a cancerous lump
And she cheated on me
How can I be there for her?
Even though I hate you Chad, I'm begging you to please support her

Cause I'm starin' at the ceiling once again (once again)
Wondering if I'm just wasting time (wasting time)
I'm starin' at the ceiling once again (once again)
I made a blanket from this cape of mine - now I'm sayin'

If you're lookin' for a super-hero baby
Well, motherfucker, that ain't me
I hate a lot of situations, wanna live in isolation
Make this world something that I can't see[Verse 1: Mac Lethal]
For every hole I've punched in the wall
Every piece of paper crumbled as we've suffer in the bloodiest fall
For every pulsating ego blistered into moon ripe nosebleeds
I nurse these festering wounds and drop no rose seeds
But grow an orchid garden
Now the pains on your portrait hardens with a face that resorts to jargon
Scribbled like a suicide note
Like I'll stop
I show the beauty by a profile shot
Freeze, don't fret for the truth
Cause I'll pray till I heard footsteps on the roof
I swear to god I don't believe in angels
Ask me, atheist, Ashley
Where's the wings in this relationship?
Passions has passed me, cast another spell
Mortified, melancholy, Madness to Michelle
Suicide Sarah, alliterate your fate, worship the absence and demonstrate my faith
(Glance in the mirror on my bathroom door
I saw her dance in rain in the summer downpour)
I saw her dance till the rain put the fire out
Burned at the stake, Joan of Arc, little anxious saint
I illustrate the gates of hell into my notebook her flesh burns up in the furnace
Ashes to Ashley
Earth to something earnest
I slit my wrist in cursive with an ink pen
Write a revelation, burn a stack of bibles
Question my faith, get my churlish ass to smile
Find another subtle piece of confidence to muster
Her ministry echoes in this monolithic structure
Cremate the dying Christmas trees
The winter is full of bitter, ashy, black blizzards
So when the superstition delivered
And it came down the chimney, they found her in the fireplace with me
Ashes to Ashley

[Bridge]
The fire's only half dead, how many angels can you fit on a matchhead?
Count them
Try start a fire
Do it
Turn the volume down or write a song to her movement (x4)

[Verse 2: Sadistik]
We walked a broken path while the sun was bleak
And we were holding hands on these rusted swings
That I called "us" and my love would sink
Underseas that we would drown underneath
When you would swim deep to catch my lip's speech
To try to catch drifts to catch what it means
And you found what would grow between us
So I thought about you while I wrote The Phoenix
And now my spine shivers from the notes that you speak
Of perfect pitched melodies and emotions you seek
That I'm composing in dreams, so you can see that I love you
And I'll hold your broken dreams till I'm bleeding in puddles
She breaks bones, engraves poems in gravestones (Text!)
Paints quotes of pathos as pain grows (Next!)
Rain flows became hopes of rainbows (When!)
Angels with halos and saints spoke (Blessed!)
Death to this world now we've given enough
I wanna hide you from the company that misery loves
And so I draw blood with few strokes and our love it drew close
So you can draw attention with the pen that you hold
Reveal your energy; and we'll just get to keep
The radio-active I can feel your chemistry
When we gaze at sea waves and freebase off replays
That re-late to cliches to see fate will be grace
I find peace in our dance on ice sheets
To bathe your silhouette in the tears the skies weep
We'll burn bridges to find warmth from life's storms
And cross roads at the point where lives meet
I'll show you memories I hate to reveal
If you could feel what I say Then I could say what I feel
And I finally learned what it takes to confess
I'll take you to a place filled with grace and sunsets[Intro]:
None of you
Even have a clue

[Hook]:
Aviator fly, take 'em really high
Never even see my competition in the sky
Aviator fly, super duper high
Take the mask away and kill the oxygen supply

[Verse 1]:
The sky in June, it looks dark maroon
I shovel out pieces of my heart with a spoon
I'm in my El Camino, I park on the moon
See, these are fucking tears of joy, just tears of joy
I'm saying fuck this, no congratulations from the people I came up with
All of them are hating on me, saying I'm a punk bitch
Fuck it, though, I ain't even looking twice
Y'all should have worked hard, been humble, and took advice
Ugh, I gotta lotta alcohol inside me
I love my fans cause I know that half of y'all are like me
And even if you don't like me, please show respect to the fact I'm trying to liberate your psyche
Freed up, I mean I'm trying to free up people
And if you know an artist, tell him that need a people
It's time to readjust the kick in the snare level
It's like when Seattle rock killed hair metal

[Hook]

[Verse 2]:
So happy New Year's, motherfuckers
It's looking like I've never gotta work at Fuddruckers
It's looking like the only thing I gotta do is be creative
That's the reason that I do it, I don't do it to be famous
No sir
Do I thank God for giving me my talent?
Or do I thank my chemical imbalance?
The generously gentle and degenerate jackass
Hate is not the new, it's just primitive backlash
Yes sir
So readjust your bow tie, readjust your suit
Every single one of you still needs us, this the proof
And death can't stop me, it's a beautiful obsession
I'm going past the light like a funeral procession
Freed up, I mean I'm yelling kingdom come
I always walk to the beat of my own drum
I always walk to the beat of my own drum
And I stand by the words that come from my own tongue

[Hook]

[Verse 3]:
From Abbie Hoffman to Andy Kaufman
I'm gonna be buried in the candy coffin
I'm gonna rap hard hoping it'll pay bills
Or I'll blow birds up like I'm Randy Johnson
Looking in the mirror saying, “Damn, he's awesome”
Briefcase of money, going mansion shopping
Fall bar, nice glass of brandy popping
Jaguar pool, exotic plants, and dolphins
Parents these days in the 90s
Used to say that “Hanson's awesome, Pearl Jam rules!”
Guys in tight jeans with girl shampoo
If magic stopped being sick the world can, too
And so can you
It's overdue
So suck a little juice from the soulful fruit
Stop running 'round with such a fucking hopeless crew
And get down Black Clover fool
Certified gangsters(talking)
My name is David McCleary Sheldon
I was born and raised in Kansas City, Missouri

Start it right here I don't want it to be over
Say it right here I don't want it to be over
(repeats in background)

You got a beautiful face

Sittin' on the roof of the factory high
There's a blood orange moon in the strawberry sky
To come home soon is the wishing wonder
But I'm calmed by the boom of the distant thunder
Relax, there's no television static
Just the howl's and never ending traffic
This world is plastic and fake
And I was born a few generations late
Illustrate my face feel this spunky
Yeah I'm strange as hell but I'm real as fuck
So follow my smell to the hollows and dells
And I'll show you the snake's as they swallow their tails
They're right there running the assembly lines
Where the coal gets shoveled by the carton smokers
They're parasites burrowed in the listeners minds
Nevermind, scratch that, let me start this over
Man, how far does this pigeon hole travel
Find the answer in the indigo shadows
Though you can unless you know the chant
Or the eight away labor line soldier ant
I held my mom as she died in my hands
Had to cancel the tour
I hope you guys understand
That the life of a man's gonna crack
In the eyes of his fans
When he fails to supply the demand
Now if only I could catch my breath
I got spurs on my boots, I can etch my steps
So I can find my way home when I stretch my depth
But I gotta get a disclaimer off my chest
When I talk about social ills
Or the alcohol fix or the potent pills
Understand that I wrote it with a soul to fill
I had to sketch myself a new home to build
I was baited and caught by decoys of free will
Wounded inside, I rejoiced in cheap thrills
My life was destroyed and rebuilt
Listen to the dangerous sweet noise and keep still
Introverted, borderline sick, disconcerted
Kinda slick when its quickly worded
Every tick every twist every drips assertive
With the verse every pixel is picture perfect
When at first! that's how I stitched the ferber
With the scraps and the bits of the sensory murder
And they're the antitheses as I'm rippin with the type of terrificness
The benefits of rhyming certificates kids are intimate
I'm spitting so the minute on the rhythm and I'm gettin so inventive
That there's really no equivalent
I'll rip a show, and pigeon hole, an invalid
Until they gotta tippy toe to get a dose of lithium
So tell the other kids to smell the blood I spit
Just to let them know what they hell they fuckin' with
I've felt pain and I'll feel it again
Take 'em back to the end start again
I got mental cravings for sinful tastings
And gentle phrasings with pencil shavings
I felt pain and I'll feel it again
Take 'em back to the end start again
Away

Start it right here I don't want it to be over
Say it right here I don't want it to be over
(repeats in background)

You got, you got a, you got a beautiful face
(repeats until song finishes)[Intro]

[Hook]

These are the things that I think when I've had a bottle of red wine to drink

And I hope another dream don't have to fall short, just lounging in my basketball shorts


[Verse I]

Look, I've finally married someone, I'm in love, I'm not alone
But marriage has some struggles of its own
And that creates a problem cause if I go and put that in my lyrics then my wife will be the first person to hear it
I married my best friend. I've got the best friends and a stack of photos covered in some dust particles and some dead skin
Sometimes I think about the baby that I used to be and how it's all just ultimately leading to my eulogy
You see, life hurts like a bitch sometimes. I mean sometimes, I hate the fuckin' sunshine so I go get enough wine at one time to hide up in my confines and unwind while vibin' to some Sublime
I just want to take my mind off all this angry fan mail accusing me of selling out, telling me I ran stale
Getting hurt by people that I'm trying to please, apparently I need to rap while on the flying trapeze
Jeez, I bought another lottery ticket tonight and out the six numbers I picked not one single digit was right
But life's been so stressful that I'll be honest, the last thing I need is a hundred million dollars


[Hook]

These are the things that I think when I've had two bottles of red wine to drink
And I hope another dream don't have to fall short, just lounging in my Jayhawks basketball shorts


[Verse II]

These days my dad is my friend
I mean last night at the we had martinis with gin and he told me that he thinks Beyonce is a 9.5- maybe a 10, and she has really pretty skin, and I smiled
I like smiling. I like fantasizing about the day I'm gonna own my own island
I like fantasizing about the day that this anxiety won't constantly be turning all my skies gray
Over-analyitcal, constantly self-critical, I don't need three wishes, just one: make me invisible
Cause I remember days I'd get on stage to a crowd of twenty
People and only seven of them paid
Rich kids with college degrees coming up and saying, "Fuck fame and money. Never follow 'em please
I love your music, I downloaded all of it free. Why would you care? You're a rap star, your profit is deep."
Jeez, life hurts like a bitch but sometimes I love it. Seriously, sometimes I look at my life and straight love it. But only on the days I close my eyes and say fuck it


[Hook]

These are the things that I think when I've had two bottles of red wine to drink
And I hope another dream don't have to fall short, just lounging in my Jayhawks basketball shorts


[Bridge]

And I'm hoping for and I'm hoping for tomorrow cause paradise is found in a bottle, paradise is found in a bottle, yes it is
And the woman on the plane in front of me, she keeps farting and it smells so bad that I can't take a nap
I think she's gotta take a crap but that's neither here nor there
Here we go


[Verse III]

Look man, I'm just searching for a pot of gold
I fear the day that people say my heart has gotten cold
Staring at my friends at Guitar Center, I am your broken-hearted, scarred, mentor
Oh shit, I'm gonna have a baby in like ten days
He's gonna be my little prince, I can't wait
Life is intense and you know I'm gonna take a knife when I glimpse


[Hook ]

These are the things that I think when I've had a bottle of red wine to drink
And I hope another dream don't have to fall short when I'm lounging in my basketball shorts
Wait, no, no
These are the things that I think when I've had two bottles of red wine to drink
And I hope another dream don't have to fall short when I'm lounging in my Jayhawks basketball shorts. That's KU, by the way
These are the things that I think when I've had three bottles of red wine to drink
And I want a couple LA tacos and some motherfucking Roscoe's, always
These are the things that I think when I've had five bottles of red wine to drink
And that's way too much wine to drink


[Outro]And I might suck at guitar -
But at least I've never protested a dead soldier's funeral
And I might be losing my hair
But at least I've never judged a woman for thinking another woman is beautiful
And sometimes, I mean sometimes
I might even text message while I drive (woooo!)
But I've never thanked God when a precious 5 year old child was shot, and died
What's it to you? You got something so sick
Just busting through you, nutty cuckoo
It's so ugly brutal, how you let the money move you
From being faceless to racist, straight spitting salacious hate fits
No better than Honey BooBoo sitting in her runny doo-doo
Bloody voodoo -- the clock strikes midnight
Now gimme that insight
Human beings are so intelligent
We gotta be a little bitty better than this right?
But nope, we keep on de-evolving
As billionaires keep on golfing
And the Mayans said the world was gonna stop
As the planet went a POP - but whaddya know? It keeps revolving
Speed it up-
Every time I turn the television on
I see another thing reminding me that everything is wrong
I see news people interviewing 5 year old children
Not even 30 minutes after witnessing a killing
I know its cliche, but do you remember the Middle East?
Do you even care, do you wonder, do you feel at least
Worried about how our troops are pulling through it?
Do you ever get to thinking about these bullied students?
Do you... do you ever consider
The homeless man that's sleeping under bridges every December
Its freezing cold and all he wants is just a sweater or dinner
But not a single one of us can seem to ever remember
Too busy caught up in the media frenzy, when a problem
Child, gets a gun and goes Gangnam Style
He's taking a weapon, slipping the clip in
Kids are dumpin and hitting the asphalt
I'm thinking half the kids in this country are on bath salts

(Hook)

Illuminati consumer hotties that do pilates
Lotta loot and dollars to do photography
Shoot her body, bada boom ba bada
Azul, Assata Shakur just shot a cop
In Cuba, bounty the beauty's medulla oblongata
Monumental, menopausal mini-movie fame whores
And that don't really make sense but, either does the race war
I'm sick and I'm picking a fight, I switch on the brights, I'm slow coasting
I'm getting your mind so open, just like I'm Joe Rogan
Some people are just sick people
Even the word retarded can offend people
And between me and the Westboro Baptist church
I'm the one paying taxes first!
I'd rather take a punch from Ving Rhames
Than learn morals from King James
So all I'm saying is, even though I love The Constitution
The other day - some things changed[Hook]
Drinking for three days, some might say I’m on a bender
Get a bad chick back to the crib, then I bend her (Over!)
Play my shit on replay cuz I’m colder than December
“Pard no”, we don’t need no sleep, we keep it rolling off this liquor
On a
Bender, Bender, Bender, What? [x3]
I take this bottle to the head, just might drink till I’m dead, I’m on my
Bender, Bender, Bender, What? [x3]
We don’t need no sleep, we keep it rolling off this liquor

[Verse 1 – KJ]
Remix and I’m still faded
Bad bitch is still penetrated
I prefer the whiskey but I’m shooting Jager
At the bar, two hoes, looking like a player
Bitch I am your father like Darth Vader
She wanna lick on my lightsaber
The pipe layer, I’ll be damned if I chase her
Bitch you cold? I’m an icebreaker
Gotta drink a whole pint ‘fore you get to the bar
12 more shots, let ‘em know who you are
Can’t even talk straight, but the dick’s still hard
And then I cut the pussy right, leavin the clit with a scar
I’m flipping the bar like you taught each other, bitch in half
Cops wanna press but I hit the gas
Smash fast like a virgin cat gettin ass
Say that I’m tripping but I’m having a blast
COA, we piss out liquor, got your bitch doing tricks while wet like flipper
Pull it right out her twat go straight to her kisser
Then go to the stall and piss out a river
Drink so much I don’t have no liver
Only thing I would give her is some bubble gum
151, Malibu rum, that pineapple juice, if you from the town then you know what's up
Bona fide sluts wanna roll with us
Drink enough liquor to make a nun wanna fuck
Now I’m in the club with a bottle of bub, and then I pour it on my head
They be thinking I’m nuts
Remix bitch y’all know what’s up, COA been killing shit
Smashed every shot that a nigga been passed, got the whole city on this bender BITCH!

[Verse 2 – Tech N9ne]
Imma drink my drinks all night till the bartender yell “timber”
Then I get up and I’m telling all the people “look at me and all my splendor”
1 shot of Jimmy and Johnny, Jack and Jose enters
And I do about 7 of them, with everybody at the bar but nobody remembers
On top of that, pop a molly, she’s gosh and golly, but was hopping hottie
I be naughty, come up in the starless lobby, but if you call me slob
I’m roar and brawling, like Ali, I just wanna toss your body
You boss a lolly, popping across my jolly
Grim giant, have a nigga lobster prolly, begin flying
You would lick me often mommy
I say I won’t drink no mo, the next day waking up in slow-mo
But when the homies come over Imma sho go, up in the happy hour to drink more yo
Like a do-do, Caribou Lou, that’ll do you, have a nigga in blue yelling “Su'Wu”
That’d be something to make em have a booboo, super dramatic
You put it away then drinkin “Yoo-Hoo”
This gon be yo day, I got chips like frito-lay, and I’m buying
She gon say she wanna fuck Tech and COA
She want our members in her, but we drunk as fuck and driving
Sexist slander, hope we don’t have no fender bender!

[Verse 3 – thePhantom*]
Phantom
I’m so drunk I might fuck even if I’m kin to her
I’m swerving, put it in the hole like Julius Irving
I can’t really feel my nerve endings, who the fuck is serving drinks?
I would like a ‘drother nink’
Just threw up in the sink and busted a nut on a pair of triple D’s
Why you got to put the phantom after Tech
I be the killer with the realest so I’m after bath
Mac, cuz everybody with me coming after sex laugh
And even on a bender you can have the rest
Pray your mom, make em put their hands up like Panama
Dammit I pull up to the club
And then I stand in line, wanna be favorite, but you know I’m on a bender
They won’t hinder the snake when I slither
Get getter, make dividends, take feminist’s virginity, silly me
I be killing every list lyrically
When you’re talkin bout the Phantom and you're talking about infinity
Fuck let me dumb it down
Scratch that Imma blast past half ass mother fuckers playing grab ass
Wanna stash cash, you would think I'm on a cash grab
All I want is fucking tonic and a fat ass

[Verse 4 - Mac Lethal]
Yap
Pull up on you in a stone white mothership
To bestow my punishment
I swear to god that I'm killing every motherfucker
Up in Kansas City with my lyrics and I don't write none of it
I heard your album, I don't like none of it, except that part where it ends
So Imma leave the bar with your friends
And if you come you gotta hold my other dick
I hit up Dutch Newman on Twitter
He brought a ho to my house and I made her cry like Dutch Newman on Twitter
I'm bigger than the biggest, uh-oh shots fired (Blue-Blue)
I'm on a bender with the genocide, I take your head like a hoop to
Ooh-Ooh, I'm cuckoo
I got more youtube views than you do, I got more youtube views than you too
So 1-2, its a 2 live crew, Never gonna find another 2 like me
I rip Beyonce's pussy like Blue Ivy, then I go to jail for two lifees
Then I dip, then i dip-dip, Like Dirk Diggler, baby girl this a big dick
And I'm looking like a dipstick, gonna chip yo hips, spit-spit on your lipstick
I am looking for a bitch with a pussy hole to split
That'll do the tootsie roll for me and [?]

[Verse 5 - Irv Da Phenom]
Ok I'm on a bender, whatever's in that pitcher, gone it
Pour it in my cup because I'm running out of liquor
Or Imma do the fool, Yea Imma do the fool
I wet my whistle like I just got through swimming round in the pool
What we drinking tonight? nigga I don't give a fuck
If it's 50 proof or better then I'm with whatever bruh
Even wine is fine, I drink until I'm blind
We gon talk about tonight like "you remember that one time?"
You was dancing with that big girl, and I think you took her home
Off of grey goose, and Newvo, and 8 shots of Patron
Turn a booger-whoop to a model, and a riverdog to a 10
Drink a vitamin water and then I do it all again, I'm on a bend!

[Verse 6 - JL of B.Hood]
Ay, how you doing over there
You know it’s a party going on if you aren’t aware
Plenty of liquor, marijuana smoke in the air
Superstar status created the atmosphere
Gotta keep the moving though, too popular to be stagnate
It’s popping but we hopping around a follower magnet
Then wanna get an autograph, and come meet the niggas you haven't
Hope that it is everything that you ever imagined
Pool full of liquor, got high and dived in it and survived
Motherfuckers have died trying it, since 5 Friday
Liver fried and I did it
This whole time closed my eyes for 5 minutes
Anything anybody handed, I drank it
Gonna regret it in the morning if I make it
I know my limitation, I’m faded
But yo this ain’t it, gonna probably take a couple of more to make a statement
DIBKIS nigga, y'all know me, skinny light-skinned nigga with the KOD
I got an asian wife, doing it major like I was already signed by him make you believe that I’m the future
Sitting with us, you need a booster
Spitting the stuff, sick as fuck, then we unloose her
Sipping the cup, smoke a blunt cuz I'm a user
About to beat it up like I physically abuse her
Go!

[Hook]

[Verse 7 - Joey Cool]
Now I was on that bender, so I can't remember
I was on 2, got a little dismembered
Never been a big spender, but I surrendered
Our bottles of bubbly popping, nigga take a picture
Come and give it to me straight, I don't really want a mixer
But lately I'm a dick, Imma take her home and fix her
Saying I'm a forty, I'm serving and I'm a victor
Welcome to the cool life, Everybody enter
Tell me where the cash at, you should wear a hat spat
You smoke? Just a bit, nigga pass that
Get a couple shares, I fill it up with the sticky
This is how we do it, we party in Killer City
You know what I say, They drinking all through the day
Work ain't always time to play, somebody make way
I'm tryna get to the bar, Mixing some [?] and making some J
Cool it!

[Verse 8 - Dutch Newman]
Newman!
Yea, I'm on a bender bitch, double fist with my niggas on my DIBKIS shit
Got a pool full of liquor that I'm swimming with
Michael Phelps of Westport, getting ignorant
I got a bag of Amsterdam with a bad ass bitch
Said she hailed all the way from Switzerland
At the bar with the power circle and the only way that you getting in
Is with a membership
Ha, Ha, I hit up Mac Lethal on Twitter
He invited me over to his house and then I made him make me dinner
Everything is better on a bender, and all my niggas gettin wavy
Miley twerking on my dick so hard that her daddy's heart got achy-breaky

[Verse 9 - Yung Stylez]
I got a couple straps, now I'm feeling fucked up
Like I'm back with the clique, but fuck yea, we winning
I don't stop drinking to the room starts spinning
(I don't stop drinking to the room starts spinning)
Got a case full of beer, and I'm full of liquor
And unlimited to drink, We ain't fucking with a bender
I need to ask, because your head is hurting
What's a hangover, never stop swerving

[Verse 10 - Yung Prez]
Like woah, Imma get fucked up
Boy I'm getting bummy
People ask what I'm on, I say that's mad dog 20/20
Me and my nigga's getting dummy, Twisted up off the sticker
Imma get a bad bitch and bend her over, and make that ho surrender, Bender!

[Verse 11 - Godemis]
These dudes want to hate on me, what the fuck am I, a black ginger?
My dick go hard, balls to the wall on y'all, too fit for that gender
I'm gonna be wavy with a big baby, maybe blowing the cylinder
I'm the center of attention, did I fail to mention I'm on a bender?
Who's that broad, cuff her hands, Slap that bitch, cut off her pants
Excuse my niche, but I'm in a trance (Hahaha)
I'm just saying
Eat shit it's Strange Music, and these idiots want to bang to it
I done peeped them peepin', tryna creep in, reaching
Little weaklings can't do it
In a minute with a betty, and I bet she suck and fuck for a cup of KC Tea
And whenever she thinks she's ready I'm flexing, Karma Sutra, A to Z
Cut but I pay no fees, came in the bus and the bitches straight on me
I'm like you're welcome for the service now would a  bitch just do-re-me
With a head full of molly, could I be any sicker, sober be set on this liquor
In the Midi it's the Killer City, we swilling and filling up another pitcher
You know it's no fun if the homies ain't willing to sticker, flick a picture
After all I'm in need of some evidence of it so I can have something to send her
Of the bender!

[Hook][Hook - Sample]
I will sooth your pain
I will ease your strains
I got nuthin for you
Nu, nuthinn for you to gain

[Verse - 1]
Uh, uh, a black rainbow
Angel with a cracked halo
Ill make you mine but you ain't taking up my last name though
God damn, your smile is bloody, uh
I guess I’ll fuck you on a pile of money, uh
You got the swagger of a woman with a dagger
And a crooked demeanor
But nah, I ain't lookin for neither
But I just love to watch you scratch your nails on the hood of your beamer
When I open you and push in the ether

CHORUS:
*I will soothe your pain*
That’s what I say
*I will ease your strains*
But in real, but in real life
*I got nuthin for you* uh, uh
*Nu, nu, nuthin for you*
But in real, but in real life
*I got nuthin for you to gain*

[Verse - 2]
Black rainbow, funeral, eclipse
Black raincoat, beautiful, deep kiss
Taste like pussy
Digging your boyfriend a grave site secretly (secretly)
Watch the stage lights secretly
Leave with me
In the grey night creep with me
I must, have an affinity for sick disease
Cause this affair is fucking
(HIV to me)
Alcoholic red wine
Adderall at bedtime
Make it so I have to call you next time
I just don’t feel right every time I get you out your black gown
Your boyfriend is textin in the back ground
God damn, you got the swagger of a woman with a dagger
That just stood under a ladder
Holding 13 black cats
And took each one, threw it at a mirror till it shattered to the floor
My irises are blacker than before

Chorus:
*I will soothe your pain*
That’s what I say to her
*I will ease your strains, yea*
But in real, but in real life
*I got nuthin for you*
Uh, uh
*Nu, nu, nuthin for you*
But in real, but in real life
*I got nuthin for you to gain*
Nuthin at all…

[Verse - 3]
Yo, Black double rainbow
Oh god it’s luminescent
Are we being stupid?
That’s a stupid question
I ‘m just lookin at the diamond on your finger
Just remembering the fact that I ain’t buy it for you either
But in real life
You make me feel like a slut
So I'mma make you kneel like I’m tut
Bow to me
Like a God
Cause this dude loves you like the goddess that you aren’t and you're with me
You should be proud truly
Actin like it’s such a special occasion
Actin like it’s such a clever liaison
I think you got the devil emblazoned
Under the fabric of your negligée
The way you look at me
It’s like your practicing for wedding day
But in real life
He loves you
I don’t even fucking know you
Wait a second; I should say that to myself again
He loves her
But he don’t even know that you exist
So say goodbye
Blow her one more kiss
You wouldn’t give crack to a crack addict
So try to be a little pragmatic
You should go and find something true
Stop being taboo
Tell the dude the same exact thing too
Chorus:
*I will soothe your pain*
*I will ease your strains,* uh
But in real, but in real life
*I got nuthin for you*
But in real, but in real life
*Nu, nu, nuthin for you*
Uh,But in real, but in real life
*I got nuthin for you to gain*
Uh, But in real, but in real life
But in real ass life uh"Sittin' on a highway again in a broken van
Thinkin' of you again"

[Verse 1: Deacon The Villain]
In a high haze, looking at my eyes glazed
With night rain, nice Jane, and the highway
The hindsight come and hit you from the blind side
Deep in the heart, the inner parts, where you find pride
Heavy thinking about the shit we should of did
Instead of sitting sideways like some lunatics
We done took a beating that done put us on our knees
And don't even hear the click click when I turn the keys
Neglected all the checklists, proper maintenance
Spark plugs, wires, the bleedin' brakes and shit
Stupid
We was too busy screamin'
Radiator hot, then motherfucka steamin'
Transmission locked up, lack communication
And radio done take the music out of conversation
Got me sittin' looking silly on the side of the road
I rather keep it moving hitch a ride in the cold

[Hook]
Thinkin' of you again
Thinkin' of you

[Verse 2: Natti]
Her ambition faulty as my transmission
When pulled off the fluid her ass'll keep shiftin'
One touch, is a clutch, I had to keep stickin'
And my feelings died out, the spark is just missin'
This bitch won't put it in park and just listen
I keep reminiscing 'bout how she first started
Before it all turned to scrap, I'm broken hearted now
When the rubbers gone I slide to new targets
What fueled our desire put a hole in the sky
She was bound to the ground and I wanted to fly
Drove me crazy how she fronted like she wanted to die
Needing a jump, in her life so she'd break down and cry
But I still look for girls with pipes just like her
Junk in the trunk, and headlights just like her
Now, when I walk to the bus stop in the rain
I pause and catch myself thinking of her game
Mayne

[Hook]

[Verse 3: Mac Lethal]
With every single penny that I put into this transmission
It's a wonder that you're screechin' and you can't listen
The ambition of this salesperson pricin' me her quote was high
Still with primer for a coat, I'd buy ya
Like let's make a deal, shake hands
I'm missing the engine but still such a great van
Her piston is hissin' with 80's drama and the whole nine
On top of that, my baby's mama had to cosign
If a piss stain can locate a fire
I can reshape the bent frame and rotate the tires
While hand signals switch lanes
Though it's not a terrible perk
The radio is only AM and barely works
Still, for a few weeks
You could see me leaned back, smilin', excited on the blue streets
But now you're on E, something in your inside's blown
And I'mma have to hitch hike home
Goddamn it

[Hook][Intro]
This is for anyone wishing they could do their entire life over:
Quit sulking, you fucking pussy
Yeah yeah yeah, clown on my accent all you want
I'll whoop your cat's ass. I'll whoop your grandmothers ass
I'll whoop your sisters ass. I'll whoop your ass
I'll beat your moms ass. I'll kick your ass

[Verse One]
Its the anti-socialite not-so-christian
That'll talk more shit than bitter and old women
On puny ass rappers with little-to-no rhythm
Fuck veganism give me some General Tso's Chicken
I write weird songs that got hooks like Journey
And if I grew my hair out I'd probably look like Fergie
But I'd never tinkle in my pants while I was on stage
Cause I was potty trained when I was four years of age
I think a lot of people these days are bitches
I also think that emo and emotional are different
But more so I hate white girls that talk like
"Aww hell no, girl I'm gettin' this shit crunk
You know what I'm sayin'?"
I'm not jokin', it's nothing but bark, I feel lost
Can't remember where the fuck that I parked
The world is gray and blue but what skates me through
Is knowing that I have a better music taste than you
I used to like Tool until they made the same album
That they made the last time they made the same album
Every time they make a damn album its the same album, really
And only stoners listen to their music, it's silly
I still think the Deftones are dope
And I like Nick Drake on the days I wanna let go of hope
Wilco is great and Ice-T is still clever
And no matter what its ALWAYS Wu-Tang Forever

[Hook] [x2]
Calm down baby
Don't you talk because
Calm down baby
Don't you talk because
I don't need lovin' and I don't need help
I'd rather ride in the car by my goddamn self

[Verse Two]
I'm 25 I started rapping as a sophomore
In those days I'd hide my cigarettes in my sock drawer
Until I heard my mom snorin' sleeping on the green couch
And then I'd secretively sneak out
My first taste of heartbreak was at the park late one summer night
I had a big crush on a girl named Sarah
I was gonna ask her out until I saw Tim Phillips kissing her grabbing her butt
Asshole!
I was madder than FUCK and walked home
Oh, Tim Phillips smells like Cool Water cologne
Well fuck him, his Mustang and all his other friends
I vowed I would never love again
And since then I've dated but fuck that I can't give nothin'
I'd rather sail alone than have my damn ship sunken
Being single's par for the course
I don't wanna cause a marriage
Cause I don't wanna cause a divorce
Its probably important and its better for health
Besides, I get the whole damn bed to myself
But what the hell everybody yells for me to drop down my guard
No! this heart of mine's for me, it's locked down and it's scarred
Go home, I don't need me a wife, I'm happily single for life
Alright?
My name is Mac Sheldon I'm a fire-sign Leo
Alcoholic, anti-mall, anti-hero
Anti-soccer mom, anti-hipster
Pro-eating Captain Crunch cereal for dinner
Pro-taking bong hits to cure your depression
And pro-demo CD
If you got one let me check it
But never ask me what the hell I'm laughing about
See ya later
I'mma go take a nap on the couch, alright?

[Hook] [x2]
Calm down baby
Don't you talk because
Calm down baby
Don't you talk because
I don't need lovin' and I don't need help
I'd rather ride in the car by my goddamn self

[Outro]
Gee, Mac... what are we gonna do about this Kansan accent of yours?
Well, self, since you're asking in the third person
We're gonna fuckin' keep it!
Because it makes us pretty... and unique... and beautiful. Like birds!

I'll whoop your mother's assThe following is an exclusive excerpt from the third chapter of my new book Texts from Bennett (a novel). The book will be released on September 3rd by Simon & Schuster, and will be available wherever books are sold. Copyright © 2013 by David Sheldon.

Who’s the greatest basketball player of all time?

Who’s the most ferocious boxer of all time?

Think of a number between one and ten. Got it? Good

Michael Jordan, Mike Tyson, and the number seven are all prime examples of a single entity being such a powerful, behemoth force in their respective industries that they erase whoever came before them from memory and are used as a constant measuring tool to compare and contrast whoever comes after them

Now. Think of a few famous rappers. Got ’em? Who’d you come up with? 50 Cent? Jay-Z? Kanye West? 2Pac? Biggie? LL Cool J? Lil Wayne?

Good job. But what about white rappers? How many can you name? And no, Vanilla Ice doesn’t count. He was a major record label experiment gone awry. I mean famous, certifiably talented, white rappers. Who’d you conjure up? Got him?

Eminem

Eminem is an undeniable talent. He deserves every dollar and fan he has accrued over the last decade. However, the motherfucker kinda sorta casted a titanic eclipse over the hip-hop genre and type-casted every other melanin-deficient rapper as nothing more than an Eminem wannabe

Well, at least on a mainstream level

If I were to tell you that there are several hardworking, but not super famous, white rappers who began their careers before Eminem even existed in the public eye, and who currently make a decent-to-great living off modern rap music, would you believe me? And I don’t mean white poseurs, drinking Moscato, throwing wads of cash around in their videos, acting like “stereotypical black rappers.” I mean rappers who rap about day-to-day things people of all races go through. Authentic rappers, with skills and rhythm and a voice worth listening to. I’m one of those rappers

I’ve gone by Mac my entire life, but my legal name is David McCleary Sheldon. I’m a thirtywhatever, full-blooded American male with grandparents from Kilkenny and Cork. I inherited the classic Irish temper; a pasty, outer layer of skin; and ginger facial hair that blends with the chalky black hair my Black Irish relatives always had

A NOTE ON THOSE BLUE-EYED, DRACULA-LOOKIN’ MOTHERFUCKERS:
As I’ve explained to Bennett on at least ten different occasions, “Black Irish” is a term used to describe descendants of immigrants from the prehistoric Iberia and Basque regions who hybridized with Irish natives in 7000 BC. It’s not referring to African American people with Irish names, e.g., my sixth-grade teacher Mrs. McCormick, and Eddie Murphy.

I was born in Kansas City, Missouri, during the Leo moon to Warren and Ruth Sheldon. My dad is a hardworking, blue-collar Ohio boy who has a problem being nice to waitresses and terrible road rage. My mom was an artsy, thoughtful, Saint Louis belle, who was always very nice to waitresses and drove too slow. My parents divorced when I was five years old, so I never really saw them married, but they lived only a few blocks away from each other, so I had a solid relationship with both of them while growing up. My mom died in 2004, but I still have my dad; my two sisters, Rose and Evelyn; and their great husbands, Greg and Henry

I’ve loved Brazilian jujitsu, movies, and rap music for my entire life. I spent a majority of my formative years having vivid daydreams, staring into the distance, thinking about girls, and being completely disconnected from what was going on in the classroom. I was a space cadet, fully apathetic to the idea of success or work. School was so boring. I just wanted to sleep

What might surprise people: my Kansas City high school was a third Caucasian, a third Latino, and a third African American. There were also a few Asian and Indian kids, a band of Russians, and one Lakota kid, who came to school on hallucinogenic mushrooms at least twice a week and whose legal name was Adam Little Elk Running Over the Enemy. (What up, Adam? Call me when you see this!) There were a lot of drugs, fights, and troubled kids at my school. There was also a nursery for the girls who had babies

I wasn’t necessarily a bad kid, especially compared to some. But I did have disciplinary issues. I skipped school a lot, got caught smoking pot in the parking lot a few times, and even got busted for having vodka mixed into a plastic bottle of Tropicana orange juice. I just wasn’t stimulated by the stuff my teachers were teaching

I tried to get my parents to let me attend an art school of some sort, where I could develop right-brain abilities like sketching, oil painting, and creative writing -— but they declined. They didn’t have the money to send me somewhere like that. So, instead, I just sat in decay, year after year, letting public schoolteachers cover my third eye with black spray paint

One random, agonizingly boring day during sophomore year, having slept through my morning classes, I was quite refreshed after lunch and was sitting in study hall with nothing to do. Not unusual. That day, though, I borrowed a piece of paper from Letasha Tilman and wrote MC Reptile at the top of it (my first rapper alias)

I still remember the verse by heart:

My name is MC Reptile
I weave words together like textiles
I grab the microphone and smack the sheriff off his saddle
I battle like a rattlesnake and make you all skidaddle
Rappers fuck with me they get beaten like eggs
You try to kick rhymes and I’m eatin’ your legs
I stay so fresh, cook rappers like gizzards
Bitch I’m the wizard, the Reptile lizard

It may not look like much, but the mere act of writing those eight lines permanently seared the cobwebs from my imagination and inspired me to never sleep during class again. Instead, I began nurturing my passion for rapping

I’d heard the cliché: “You must spend ten thousand hours intensely practicing something to master it.” So for the next six years, I did just that. I filled countless notebooks with rap lyrics, constantly challenging myself to parent my own, unique writing style. I read dictionaries and thesauri to expand my vocabulary, memorizing all sorts of exotic words and their definitions

Borborygmus: the rumbling sound of gas passing through the intestine
Fuscoferuginous: having a dark, rusty color
Quomodocunquize: to make money by any means possible

I read every book I could find by William S. Burroughs, Jack Kerouac, Vladimir Nabokov, Ernest Hemingway, Mikhail Bulgakov, Kurt Vonnegut, and Cormac McCarthy to try and learn how to write with deliberate fluidity. I devoured every rap album I could find, picking apart each rapper’s deficiencies, adopting my interpretation of their strengths. I would freestyle rap for hours in my bedroom into a handheld tape recorder, while doing jumping jacks and push-ups. This helped me simultaneously improvise new rap ideas and develop lung power, projection, verbal articulation, enunciation, and breath control

I was methodical. I drilled constantly, pushing myself to improve. I never set out to be famous, or even make a living off music. I just wanted to impress kids in the high school cafeteria with my freestyle raps, while I made fun of Margot Glasscock’s last name, or rapped about sleeping with Miss Steele, the school’s foxy, thirty-two-year-old algebra teacher

After honing my rapping skills, I set up a makeshift studio in my mom’s basement and recorded my first album, Mixed Drinks. The writing was funny, weird, and quirky. I made songs about not being able to find my car keys, and getting broken up with by a girl I didn’t like in the first place but wanting to win her back just to have bragging rights on who broke up with whom. While it was lo-fi and sounded like crap, the people I passed it out to seemed to enjoy it for what it was. So I dropped out of high school and decided to pursue being a rapper full-time. Backup plans are for pussies

Touring seemed like the best way to expand my career, so I spent years networking with other independent artists, driving ten to fifteen hours every day, just to play free shows for crowds of fewer than fifty people. I passed out free tapes (and eventually CDs) that I assembled myself at Kinko’s and slept on the beer-stained apartment floors of random weirdos my crew and I would meet at shows, to avoid paying for a hotel room. I could fill an entire book with tour stories from my early years, most of them unfortunate

Touring and building a fan base from scratch is immensely hard, and most people don’t even achieve moderate success doing it. Most people quit the first time they fall flat on their face. Believe me, you have to be partially nuts to endure the things that traveling, working entertainers endure

Only 1 percent become megastars. The other 99 percent of us are on a daily grind, dreaming we can one day pay off our bills from music

Luckily, my dreams started to come true. After giving a passionate decade of my life to being a rapper, I started to turn a profit. My tiny, scattered, local following had enveloped into a dedicated worldwide fan base. I could play just about any part of the world, and pull at least one hundred people -- one thousand in some places

I sold t-shirts, CDs, trucker hats, sweatshirts, dog bowls, backpacks, fanny packs, socks, girl panties, pint glasses, shot glasses, et cetera -- all with my logo printed on them. I was a working, self-funded, independent rap artist, selling out shows, paying the bills, and living a dream that is oft never achieved by a majority of musicians, let alone rappers

For once in my life, music was no longer a struggle. It was a highly lucrative roller-coaster ride that afforded me the ability to travel anywhere and purchase anything I wanted, which was new to me, and slightly unsettling. I knew there was no way this could last forever, so I decided to invest my money wisely while my chips were up. I found an amazing, albeit slightly gaudy, house in the Brookside area of Kansas City, Missouri, put down a giant down payment (since touring tends to lead to bad credit), and moved in

I had my own home (I bought a house!), and it felt great

Me: Hey fucker, guess who?

Bennett: ?

Me: Guess who this is, you little dicked twerp

Bennett: ho i told u to stop texten me my girl gonna c dat shit

Bennett: bcide u wuz luven my big dicc in da parkin lot da otha nite lol slut

Me: Lol, you think this is a girl

Bennett: dis is ashly duh

Bennett: look.. u ever seen a tigger or a lion git married?

Bennett: u ever seen a eagel wit a diamend ring on it”s finger?

Bennett: no u haven't dats bcuz men R not saposed 2 be wit 1 women. men R wild animels......i fucc alot of hoez cuz men r saposed 2 spred there seed da bibel says we gatta evolve and fucc

Me: This isn’t a girl!!!!

Bennett: wat

Bennett: now u gunna try 2 say u were a guy da hole time?bitch i seen ur vaginna u a girl or u got a realy gud sex change

Me: LOL, STOP. This isn’t fucking Ashley. Who’s Ashley?

Bennett: quit playn on my phone bitch who dis !!!

Me: It’s Mac

Me: Helllooooo???

Bennett: mac my cuz??..

Me: Yes sir

Bennett: o shit lolz

Bennett: wud up G

Me: Care to explain what’s happening with your mom losing her house?

Bennett: man.. it sux

Bennett: basicly da punk ass govermant niggas is kiccin us out da crib Cuz day so broke dat even my mom bustid ass house is wort takin

Me: Is she not doing well? Why can’t she pay the bills?

Bennett: nigga my mom on Oxycotton 247365 times a day

Me: Do you mean 24/7/365?

Bennett: ya but im gittin sum pussy right now so i ain't have time to type dat side ways / thing

Me: Liar. You said “times a day” which negates a / even working. Bennett: look pussy u alweys talk shit to me when we txt.. u probaly jellice from all da COCC i sell and da $$$ i get

Me: You make money selling cock?

Bennett: na COCC... fuccin.. cocainn

NOTE FOR THOSE LOOKING TO LEARN HOW TO SPEAK FLUENT CRIP:
Members of the Crips do not ever put the letters C and K next to each other and just use two C’s instead. CK stands for Crip Killer, so this is a very serious typographical issue

Me: I’m fucking with you. WHY is your mom on OxyContin?

Bennett: cuz she also sleep all day an stop payen da bills..

Me: Her back is fucked up still, right? But OxyContin? Does she need OxyContin?

Bennett: ya she in pain alot. butt cmon playa n e 1 who take oxycotton does it for fun not bcuz they need it..nigga u ever try dat shit?it make u feel like ur 2pac in dat hot tub holden stax of cash pouren chammpane on a striperz head

Me: I see. Uh. Also, who’s Tim?

Bennett: dats my mom BF

Me: Yeah? You live with him, yeah? Why can’t he help with the bills?

Bennett: he wierd. he duz acid and smoke hella weed wit me but he a bum ass nigga 2.haha. he broke as fuk

Bennett: butt he smart like U doe.....

Bennett: he read sum wild ass books like U. sum crazy shit wit Da Illuminadi. he a wild ass nigga

Bennett: he show me a video on UTube of 911 an how da govermant planted dinamite in da billdings and blew dem up

Me: Do you believe that stuff, Bennett?

Bennett: hell yea who doeznt.?da white house has a grave unda it wit gosts and shit

Bennett: i dont beleive anything on Da news

Me: Right on, buddy. I’m going to call your mom. What’s her number?

Bennett: K hang on

Bennett: 913-648-****

Now that I knew more of the scoop, I called Aunt Lillian and extended an invitation for them all to come stay with me for a few weeks. She was so intoxicated on painkillers that I couldn’t understand a word she said, other than, “Thank you so much!”

This was spur of the moment, but I knew it was the right thing to do. Family is family. You’re supposed to help family. Right? And all I wanted to do right then was help my aunt. Especially after hearing the pain and confusion in her voice over the phone

Especially after what she did for me in 2002.

Continues...Taking it down
Dicking it down
Sticking my dick in and
Kicking a venomous sentiment
Isn't it eminent
That I'm invincible
Head full of demons and chemicals
Flipping the furniture
In my hotel room
My wallet is missing
I'm going insane
So I'm dipping my hand
In my pocket
Then flipping my finger
Fuck you all
I'm doing cocaine
Take a vacation
With porno star bitches
I puke in the trash bin
Cause I'm two and a half men
I won't die
And anyone that's died
Is really stupid
Just ask them sinister
Fucking unscrupulous laughter
Rock and porn life
This is all a lesson
Never fuck Roger Dorn's wife
It's my life
And I'm tired of pretending
I am not special I'm making them clap
I'm still an F18 when taking a nap
I'm a battle tested bayonet
That will violently love
Till we ice age swimming
I GOT TIGER BLOOD I STAY WINNING, bitch![Intro]
Yo! Yo! eh yo a yo a yo. Yo! Yo! eh yo a yo a yo!
Yo! YO! Yo!
(shut up.) (fuck up)

[Verse One]
Innovative one, call me the creative one
Mac lick a foreign pussy with the pierced native tongue
Probably speak in accents like its hard to calm her
I use a metal tortoise shell as my body armor
I got a mutated gold mastiff
With 12 eyes and a lime green tongue that spits acid
I duct tape her mouth shut with I hang around sluts
Cause she'll get jealous and chew em' into ground chuck
My carnage rips like a hammer head shark
Spitting liquid nitrogen until the speakers look frost bitten
My car engine is connected to my fierce prose
Releasing sound demons that nibble ear lobes
With the wave of my right hand
The mic stand on stage morph into a tight band to strike fans with rage
Ladies love me when I spray the mic
But there ain't no 'I' in snuggle and there ain't no 'U' in "stay the night"

[Hook]
Hey yo rappers with the sweet skills
Chicks into cheap thrills
Alcoholics smoking gasoline weed lets build
Feel the beat hit your spine when it slams you
Take a swig of the 40 and spark up the bamboo

We puff the bamboo everyday! [x4]

[Verse Two]
I don't live by the sword I don't live by the gun
I live by the gas station that sells blunts by the one
My floor is surrounded by dripping candles
I'll poke my fingers through your eyes like scissor handles
The robots talk to me in uteral, like
(Mac your our planet's secret weapon find a studio!)
Cyborgs travel in twisted orbs
To master alien genocide in the mixing board
Controversy?
It's more like Contra when the lasers bust
I'm puttin on a surgical glove
And dippin in a glass full of water discolored from the razor rust
(It's music)
Crumpled in the rubble lookin knuckled headed divas
I buck with jeans so I can show my double headed penis
So you can treat it like a honey suckle munch and eat it
I was a demon God in violent and destructive fetus

[Hook 2]
Hey yo rappers with the sweet skills
Chicks into cheap thrills
Alcoholics smokin gasoline weed lets build
Mac lethal can you feel it or are you just too fucked up from bamboo sticks?
Puff a little bit of the monster funk
Puff a little bit of the monster funk
Puff a little bit of the monster funk
Smoke some bamboo and get fucked up

[Verse Three]
It's S.G
The one that put the fingers in your panties
And told me that the pussy wasn't hairy
In control with probes
My skulls stretched to see the world like I replaced my eyeballs with globes
Its like Clubber Lang was a space cadet
I might dub your brain to a tape cassette
My face compress to levitate
So take my tape out now give it a kiss and plan a second date
Never understand how I'm screwin raps
My medulla snaps and soul claps it feels like a bazooka blast
I blew the gas through the tubes mumu lash out
Light illuminate and prove the scrap and sewage rats
In your relationship your girls the boss
And if she don't call in 15 minutes I'm jerkin off
You can't get with the way leezy swervin
I just make you blow like Pee Wee Herman

[Outro]
Uh-ha-haha
A little bit of the bamboo sticks!
A little green dirty ass weed, sprinkled with some white nose candy for flavor. Twisted up in one to make you feel oky-loc until you look like muthafuckin Mokie Loc. Uhhhh....

Puff a little bit of the monster funk, puff a little bit of the monster funk
Puff a little bit of the monster funk, man shut the fuck up![Verse 1: R.A. The Rugged Man]
Listening to Christopher Wallace, wait, hold up, it's the holidays
Put on Run-DMC, Christmas in Hollis
And if you're rocking a yamaka happy Hanukkah
There's icicles hanging from the roof and gutters, and snow on the thermometer
Jack Frost, he a cold man
Snow White ho looking for blow from Frosty the Snowman
Chris Greenwood was a bitch, I kicked him in his big jaws
I visit Miss Claus, got her clothes ripped off
But that old bitch got my dick soft, now the elves are pissed off
Santa's big ass look like a white Rick Ross
Sugar pancakes, syrup and marshmallows in the hams
I got a pair of Puma sneakers, look like MC Shan
In school we'd make fun of kids that were Jehovah's Witness
Cause they couldn't celebrate Halloween, birthdays and christmas
Now I'm kissing the clit, it bleeded, what the hell, gross
Come out the pussy looking like Rudolph with the red nose
Train sets, toy trucks from Tonka, Italianos mangia
My black people light a candle for Kwanzaa
I don't care if I get coal for stocking stuffers
I'mma find Santa's little helpers and midget talk the motherfuckers

[Hook: R.A. The Rugged Man]
Go Jesus, it's your birthday!
Go Jesus, it's your birthday!
Go Jesus, it's your birthday!
Go Jesus, go Jesus!

[Verse 2: R.A. The Rugged Man]
Sleigh bells jing-jingaling, front door ring-dingaling
Kids singing in the bling-bling sickening
D-flicks, silent night, deadly night, church picketing
Hannukah menorah candle light flickering
Families bickering, let me spin the hot bar
Rockstar, where my Muslims? Allah Akbar!
Want a walkman, a VCR, wait, time out
I want a red ryder BB Gun to shoot my eye out
The big Christmas picture is ridiculous
Santa Claus is based on a Catholic bishop named Saint Nicholas
Years before he was at the North Pole chilling
He was rumoured to resurrect the bodies of mutilated children
But it's Christmas and my little niece got Bieber fever
I'm in L.A, I'll pick her up the CD at Amoeba
I hate to bring in the new year with a dark side
But who gon' drop the ball in Times Square now that Dick Clark died

[Hook]

[Verse 3: Mac Lethal]
C'mon, Get Poor or Die Tryin'
Consumerism is a new religion for the people in stores that lie crying?
Praying, just wishing for a great sale
Traded in my '64 to listen to the sleigh bells
Fuck it, it's a holidays bitch
I ain't buying any presents, I'mma walk away rich
I mean I'm Satan Claus, I'm a selfish fuck
I ain't giving any gifts to these helpless schmucks
Should I smack Grandma or let her talk instead?
Bitch looks like she belongs on The Walking Dead
I can't stuff her when words are in her mouth
I listen to that talking head, when I be burning down the house
I flame "fuck" to the mammoth elephant
The hammer fell, and then I cooked a little honey ham and gelatine
I blast, I burn in your heart, three dudes ringing your bell
Hoping they're tools like Nebraska Furniture Mart
Oooooooh shit!
A lotta hippie bitches take molly, looking stupid with the glow sticks
You people never seen a boy like this
I punch your baby momma in the fucking muay Thai clinch
You need to stop looking at the toys I get
I'm the grinch penny-pinching every coin I flip
I'm a hip-hop head, I ain't a hipster person
That watches The Office the British version
(Go Jesus!) I'll take you on a big excursion
Hopefully I'll get the words in
The last year Santa ate the cookies and he dropped down the whiskey
So I'mma clap his ass when he come down the chimney
(Go Jesus!) Huh, It's the exorcist
Are you a naughty ass bitch? Let me check my list
I drink Jesus blood, and tell him to bless my piss
Mac Lethal, Rugged Man, here's your X-mas gift![Verse 1]
Go
The movie starts
"Sweet Emotion"'s playing in the background
Kids are smoking weed with slater
Man he's such a class clown
All the cars are full of beer, Bacardi and Liquor
Because tonight there is a giant house party at Pickford's
It's the last day of school
Slater is trippin'
Tony had a weird dream
And tells mike he should listen
In his dream he had a naked girl her boobies were decent
But then the naked body's head belonged to Abraham Lincoln
Whoah
Don gives Randal Pink a pledge sheet for football that says
He can't do drugs while Benny's making a paddle
Jodi begs the guys not to hurt her brother Mitch Kramer
But they still plan to damn they're such assholes
They're breaking it down, for the football coach
"You have to use substance?
Randal pink you better be giving yourself an attitude adjustment."
So they drive up to the middle school to make a big announcement
Mitchy, Mitchy, Mitchy do not run don't think about it
Mitch asks the teacher if they can escape through the back
"50 going on a mission, 25 ain't coming back,"
School is over but they're getting chased like fuck it lets be out
Carl's mom pulls out a gun, "But there's ruffians about,"
(Air raid you freshman bitches!)
They're smoking weed in Pickford's room
The beer man brought the kegs too soon
The party's cancelled, ruining the plans that were in store
Cause if you go to Pickford's house and knock his dad answers the door
Mitch is at his game he's pitching' and he's terrified
Oh holy shit he looks up in the bleachers and right there's the guys
They catch him and then end him over beat him 'til his canny's pink
Now he can hardly walk and so he gets a ride from Randy Pink
They pick him up later like he's a foolish little kid
"You got a joint?" "No i don't," "Well it'd be cooler if you did."
Alright, alright, alright, theres Wooderson he's such a crazy fool
They go to the emporium to meet some girls and play some pool
You leave the dance, you can't come back
But fuck it those kids didn't care
They wanna walk around a bit but Herschfelder was "Gettin' there."
Now they're getting chased and they get liked by O'Bannon
Wee, Wee, Wee squeal like a pig oh my god they can't stand him
Now they're breaking mailboxes with cans that's meant for trash
Get a gun pulled on em "fuck this old man, Pickford hit the gas!"
They get revenge on O'Bannon, with Hardy laughter dude scours
Wodderson plotted a beerbst, awesome party at the moon tower!
President George Washington was not a homosapien
Ain't you ever hear the song: "The Presidents are Aliens?"
Mitch and Julie hit it off, theyre prolly gonna get it on
The beer is flowin nicely then abruptly everything went wrong
Smells like someone’s smokin reefer! i’m the one thats smokin reefer
Push him, sucker punch him, oopsie daisies put him in the sleeper
Dominant alpha male mothafucker you fuckin disgust me i hate your guts
He’s kickin his ass hes punchin and kickin and killin him til they break it up
God damn it, he’s lucky that he’s still alive
Stupid mothafucka had to ruin shit and kill the vibe
The party’s over, keg is tapped, it’s get up in the car time
Lets go smoke a joint right on the 50 fuckin yard line!
Break down! giggling! party in the hot night!
Mustve been too loud or something theres a fuckin cop light
Cops are talkin shit like they can smell beer and smell smoke
Randy Floyd is gettin high well wait til i go tell coach!
Coach comes, mad as hell, Randy Pink, let’s speak
Ditch your loser friends right now and sign your freakin pledge sheet
Sorry coach I got a speech for you it goes like this
Ya see I might play football in the fall but nope i won't sign this, peace!
Mitch and Julie making out until the sun rise
Mama grabs him by the ear you’re off the hook this one time
Mitchell are you drunk right now? heck no mom
Happy end Mitch Kramer goes to sleep with headphones on
Dazed and Confused[Intro]


[Hook]

Freedom tastes good on my tongue
Like a piece of twenty five cent bubblegum
So numb to the rush, so numb to the delicate touch
This is your delicate touch
And she says "listen to yourself
I just wanna be there, sickness and in health, nothing else"
There ain't no rush
This is my delicate touch
This is my delicate touch


[Verse I]

Crazy
Stress-pot pretty
Drivin' round lost in the city
I say it so simply
Autumn is ablaze, dead leaves and black fire
I'm walkin tiptoe, overtop a quagmire
No more cat and mouse, now I help pick paint colors for the house
Pop the cork, I might strip another screw
Love...is when you miss somebody that's sitting right in front of you
I get it indeed, you're a different breed
With different needs
You touch my heart, and your fingertip bleeds
I'm sorry that it's sharp to the touch and my heart doesn't gush
And I do not listen
Male traits
When a new plot thickens, stalemate
Cannot move another piece from the pieces that we shatter to
Til we hold hands walkin up the avenue
Midnight stroll. Grip tight hold
Got two black aces but I just might fold
This last name should be your last name
(Hold on let me say that again.)
Ok midnight stroll
Grip tight hold, I don't wanna play games
I just might fold
This last name should be your last name
I say these vows in vain


[Hook]

Freedom tastes good on my tongue
Like a piece of twenty five cent bubblegum
So numb to the rush, so numb to the delicate touch
This is your delicate touch
And she says "listen to yourself
I just wanna be there, sickness and in health, nothing else"
There ain't no rush
This is my delicate touch
This is my delicate touch


[Verse II]

If I had one word to describe, you and me together
It would be "alive"
I am so alive, but I could sit here and just die
My life is unbuttoned, heart strings untie
Tangled in your hair
Like a dreamy boy with a blanket
Waitin at the stairs
You're different parts, that I soak 'til my lips are parched
With spongey words and a kiss that's tart
This ain't a love life, this is art
Those little quirks that I pick apart
We went from making up shit like three month anniversaries
To sick fights
From speculation to dreams
Of givin' you mixed cd's and wedding rings
I dont' wanna crush, I'd rather build
Keep everything in a shoe box except those heels
For the midnight stroll, grip tight hold
Get a blanket when the sun sets it gets quite cold
This last name should be your last name
I'ma let you rush into my veins


[Hook x2]

Freedom tastes good on my tongue
Like a piece of twenty five cent bubblegum
So numb to the rush, so numb to the delicate touch
This is your delicate touch
And she says "listen to yourself
I just wanna be there, sickness and in health, nothing else"
There ain't no rush
This is my delicate touch
This is my delicate touch


[Outro][Bridge x2: Mac Lethal]
Fuck a major record label
Stack the CEOs under the table
Fuck a major record label
Stack the A&Rs under the table

[Hook: Chamillionaire & Mac Lethal]
You the truth is
I lose my cool quick
Don’t make me lose it
You’ll see what lewd is
You see the truth is
I’m not like you kid
So don’t be foolish
I just might prove it
Just try not to piss me off

[x2]
You should tell them not to piss me off
Because I’ll turn them into history y’all (Don’t piss me off)
So please, just please don’t piss me off (Don’t piss me off)

Chamillionaire, go

[Verse 1: Chamillionaire]
I was calm for a minute, yeah I started off calm
Til I saw a fake rapper with an Audemars on
Then I realized with my seeing eyes it was same man
That did came in with the Audemars on
Didn’t really think that we would audit y’all, huh?
Cause it seemed that you really got you balling on wrong
Whole bunch of jewelers that I oughtta call on
Just to show them that you’re faker than Mardi Gras charm
Can’t stand y’all, I’m loving every thought of y’all gone
I can read the future like it’s written on you palm
One hand on my cellie while I’m calling your mom
Got your sis strip teasing in a falling off thong
Pick them up, take them with me in the car to your prom
They know my money longer than a Ramadan song
But I ain’t trying to hit
I’m just trying to hit your face on your car while you got your car alarm on
See how many rappers I can get to retire
If you spit, I’m just hoping that you slip on saliva
Turn a Coke can with a kickstand to a time bomb
Give it to you then I disappear like McGyver
There will be no survivors
There will be no reminders
Got a cannon but I bet you never seeing Mariah
Give a second and I bet you’re going to see them on fire
When you see that you’re going to see that these other riders is liars
See my Mac is lethal, plus Mac is lethal
Turn you into macaroni when we blasting people
See they’re actors, they got me yelling “Action people!”
Dig them up kill them again just like an action sequel
Everybody sound the same but its just overkill
Put a hole in your chest see what your soul reveal
Got a rusty Black and Decker, call it Woody Woodpecker
Then I “vrrmmmm” in your heart so you can know the drill

[Hook]

[Mac Lethal]
I was calm for a minute, but I started off angry
And didn’t kill everybody, thank me
I’m the only human being in the fucking world that got rabies
Digging up your garden, shitting in your daisies (Woof)
Put some candy in my bowl
I’m always trying to run away from animal control
I’m a ghost, I’m a ghoul, I’m a demon, I’m a rogue
I’m a screaming little toad, I’m a phantom with no soul
Goddamnit I’ll kill you, and even if you kill me
They're gonna think I let you like I’m Anderson Silva
Man fuck all the radio bullshit
Fuck anything that’s watered down like American pills
Now Mac Lethal, man, what the fuck is wrong with him?
Even Tech 9 won’t do a song with him
If a rapper got a girl, man, she going to quit him
I’ll stretch him out until his epidermis don’t fit him (ah)
I give fuck about a bitch being trill
She can give brain in the kitchen like Richie Aprile
Drink wine in a warm red glass
Spitting game to a dame with a fine little corn-fed ass
Like Mike Tyson I beat it up until she couldn’t walk
Told if she isn’t trying to fornicate she shouldn’t talk (Uh)
I never spoiler her
I just tell her all the Breaking Bad spoilers
Fuck all the mockery you’re making
Every single tooth, every bone every fossil I’m breaking
Mac Lethal got the fucking soccer moms shaking
Like they popping and they breaking
Saying “As-salamu alaykum”
Everybody sounds the same and it’s just overkill
In fact, most rap groups sound like Soul for Real
If you don’t want to get your soldiers killed
You better throw your shield
And head over hills
You know the drill

[Hook]

[Mac Lethal]
Hey, Chamillionaire. Thanks for the verse dude
Keep killing it independently[Intro]
Sick of February, I can tell you that
This is just a quick song I made today, in the living room

[Verse 1]
And I got friends asking me, "What's with all the tragedy?
This is not the way it has to be."
I'm glad to be a part of all the black and white photos
My family has taken all the songs, yes I know those
It gets intense on my soul, don't you take it from me Judas
I feel so fucking naked in my music
But I cannot survive if I lied to the public and I shelled my heart
Last time I tried I fell apart
I fell in love with a Goddess more arrogant than modest
And the oddest part about it was it turned so toxic
Ripped up the pictures, nothing personal it's war
But every Facebook tag of us hurts a little more
And every anniversary I'm sore
Pain to the fullest
Chamber the pain like I chambered the bullet
That I put in my revolver fucking aimed and I pulled it
I'm trying to pretend this winter ain't been the coldest
But I can feel it in the air

There's something about February, that... drains everybody

[Verse 2]
And if I die, play Wu-Tang at my funeral
Trust me though, my life's been beautiful
What a coincidence that those words rhyme
But you were dead before me if you ever once closed your mind
To the possibilities of life on far away planets
The universe is way bigger than Kansas
Chatin' with the phantoms, sleeping with the white ghost
Walk into the war zone, lean against the light post
I dedicate this song to Chad Stuart, a childhood friend that died a couple days ago
One day I'll shout your name on the radio
I'm an atheist, but I promise your an angel though
I hang below the stars and the statuses
I pass a fist, but I'm a pacifist
And that's the reason I don't have a hit
But at least I have my fans and the ability to always be passionate
I will not relax a bit
And I can feel it in the air[Intro: Mac Lethal]
You, sir, are an offense to good taste
An offense to good taste...

[Verse: Mac Lethal]
It's the mantra of another four-eyed monster
Put the layers of your soul in bow tie pasta
Enter the Contra code, lock and load
Travel down the rocky road, talk to toads
Frogs and crows, or any bird with the black wings
Off the wall like when a blind bat screams
Have dreams... record them, play them
These scenes? I don't care what order they in
Mayhem--everybody felt it, amen
Hot piece of youth like melted crayons
I'm gonna make a little bit of lava
Toured in your city, now you're living in a sauna
Speak that heat rap, re-track speech facts
Homie, when I eat that sweet fat beat...
Your knee caps crack. We gonna freeze the sea
B-lee, Noah23, and me... that's that

[Hook: Noah23]
Blee on the beat so you better believe that
Tricks up my sleeve so I'm wearing a pimp's hat
Keeping it sweet like your favorite tree sap
Footloose fancy free, knock your knee caps
X2

[Verse: Noah23]
Mackadocious like the black clover
Boy, thought I told ya: it's the ayatollahs
Of this rap shit, alien prowess spiraled
In a power of the flower soil
We taking you to church like a quatrefoil
Me and Mac Lethal spit raps that's royal
Back to Earth, yo, the road is rocky
It hurts so good when we go Fugazi
23 like Johnny, Con-Air on the plane, can't stop me
Anthony Kiedis belly flop up on the concrete
Hardly at odds with the gods, it's a suicide ride
But only at home if you do it right
You could [?] George Lucas
More useless, handsome, stupid hype
And who them groupies? Yeah, it's 23, baby
Put it down, B-Lee... call me crazy

[Hook]